Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Distribution of Revenue to Public School Districts in Counties in Which Liquefied Natural Gas Terminals or Crude Oil Refineries are Located

§ 19-9-171.
Distribution of revenue from ad valorem taxes levied on certain liquefied natural gas terminals or crude oil refineries to public school districts in situs counties.

The revenue from ad valorem taxes for school district purposes that are levied upon liquefied natural gas terminals or improvements thereto constructed after July 1, 2007, crude oil refineries constructed after July 1, 2007, and expansions or improvements to existing crude oil refineries constructed after July 1, 2007, shall be distributed to all public school districts in the county in which the facilities are located in the proportion that the average daily attendance of each school district bears to the total average daily attendance of all school districts in the county. The county or municipal tax collector, as the case may be, shall pay such tax collections, except for taxes collected for the payment of the principal of and interest on school bonds or notes and except for taxes collected to defray collection costs, into the appropriate school depository and report to the school board of the appropriate school district at the same time and in the same manner as the tax collector makes his payments and reports of other taxes collected by him.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 533, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).